West Virginia, session 2026, HB4355.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. WILDLIFE RESOURCES. §20-2-56b. Upland game bird stamp. (a) A Class UB stamp is a resident upland game bird hunting stamp and a Class UBO stamp is a non-resident upland game bird hunting stamp, these stamps shall be required only to hunt and take upland game birds in a wildlife management area, and any additional lands the Director of the Division of Natural Resources may designate pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, during any upland game bird season. entitle the licensee to hunt and take upland game birds during any upland game bird season in all counties of the state The fee for a Class UB stamp is $25 and the fee for a Class UBO is $50. These stamps require the licensee purchase the appropriate base license before participating in the activities specified in this section, except as noted.: Provided, That no Class UB resident upland game bird hunting stamp shall be required to be purchased by any resident hunter who has purchased a lifetime hunting license prior to the effective date of this legislation.  (b) "Upland game birds" are defined as ruffed grouse, bobwhite quail, and ring necked pheasant. The definition of upland game birds may be modified by the West Virginia Division of Natural Resources.(c) The proceeds of the stamp shall be used by the West Virginia Division of Natural Resources to purchase and release upland game birds into West Virginia Wildlife Management Areas and to develop and manage upland game bird habitat in those same areas and any additional lands the Director of the Division of Natural Resources may later deem appropriate for such development and management.(d) Nothing in this code will remove resident landowner privileges to hunt or take upland game birds on their own property.(e) The Director shall be responsible for administering the upland game bird stamp. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home